Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.051

Examining board—Compensation and travel expenses.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

[ 2022 c 240 s 12; 1984 c 287 s 48; 1983 c 168 s 10; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 48; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 19; 1965 c 70 s 21.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.